Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Chapter 5
FOOD STAMP REVOLVING FUND

Sec.

§ 56-501. Food stamp revolving fund created — Appropriation.

There is hereby perpetually appropriated to the division of public assistance in the department of public welfare, or any successor thereto, out of any moneys in the general fund not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $100,000.00 to be deposited in the cooperative emergency revenue fund [cooperative welfare fund] for the creation of a permanent revolving fund to be known as the food stamp revolving fund, to be administered by the division of public assistance, or any successor thereto, for the purpose of enabling the state of Idaho to cooperate with the Surplus Marketing Administration in the United States Department of Agriculture, or any successor thereto, in distributing surplus agricultural products to needy persons and families under an arrangement known as the stamp plan.

§ 56-502. Defining and limiting use of fund.

All moneys in the food stamp revolving fund shall be used exclusively for the purchase of food order stamps from the United States Department of Agriculture; such stamps to be sold to needy persons or families subject to the provisions of the food stamp plan entered into with the Surplus Marketing Administration, or any successor thereto. All moneys received from the sale of such stamps or from the redemption of such stamps by the United States Department of Agriculture shall be deposited with the state treasurer and the amount thereof credited to such revolving fund.

§ 56-503. Bonding and insurance of fund — Costs.

Such bonds and insurance as may be deemed necessary or advisable for preserving and safeguarding the funds herein appropriated shall be secured, and the costs of such bonds and insurance shall be paid out of funds appropriated to the division of public assistance, or any successor thereto, for administrative expenses.

§ 56-504. Reversion of food stamp revolving fund to general fund.

If and when the need for the food stamp revolving fund shall no longer exist, the division of public assistance, or its successor, shall so advise the state board of examiners, which said board shall thereupon order that the funds herein appropriated revert to the general fund and said funds shall thereupon be so transferred.